Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1392XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1392XD (4) 91
ll/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
DIVISION I
DEFINITIONS AND LICENSE AUTHORIZATIONS
Section 1. Section 123.3, subsections 10 and 32, Code 2025,
are amended to read as follows:
10. “Canned cocktail” means a mixed drink or cocktail, the
alcohol component of which is primarily composed of alcoholic
liquor, that is premixed and packaged in a metal can and
contains more than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume
but not more than fifteen percent of alcohol by volume. A
mixed drink or cocktail mixed and packaged in a metal can
pursuant to section 123.49, subsection 2, paragraph “d”,
subparagraph (3), shall not be considered a canned cocktail.
32. “Mixed drink or cocktail” means an alcoholic beverage,
composed in whole or in part of alcoholic liquor, wine, or
beer, that is combined with other alcoholic beverages or
nonalcoholic beverages or ingredients including but not limited
to ice, water, soft drinks, or flavorings.
Sec. 2. Section 123.30, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. A retail alcohol license may be issued to any person
who is of good moral character as defined by this chapter, the
state of Iowa, or any state agency as defined in section 669.2.
Sec. 3. Section 123.30, subsection 3, paragraph b,
subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (c), Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
(c) The holder of a special class “C” retail alcohol
license shall be authorized to sell wine and beer to patrons
by the individual drink for consumption on the premises only.
However, wine and beer in original unopened containers may
also be sold for consumption off the premises. In addition, a
mixed drink or cocktail that does not contain alcoholic liquor
may be sold for consumption off the premises subject to the
requirements of section 123.49, subsection 2, paragraph “d”.
Sec. 4. Section 123.31, subsection 2, paragraphs b and c,
Code 2025, are amended to read as follows:
LSB 1392XD (4) 91
-1- ll/ns 1/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
b. That the applicant is a person of good moral character
as provided in section 123.3, subsection 40. This paragraph
does not apply if the applicant is the state of Iowa or a state
agency as defined in section 669.2.
c. That the applicant is a citizen of the state of Iowa
or, if a corporation, that the applicant is authorized to do
business in the state. This paragraph does not apply if the
applicant is the state of Iowa or a state agency as defined in
section 669.2.
Sec. 5. Section 123.31C, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. A person holding a special class “C” retail native
wine license may sell beer and native wine only at retail for
consumption on or off the premises. Sales of beer and native
wine for consumption off the premises made pursuant to this
section shall be made in original containers except as provided
in subsection 5. A sale of a mixed drink or cocktail that does
not contain alcoholic liquor may be sold for consumption off
the premises subject to the requirements of section 123.49,
subsection 2, paragraph “d”.
Sec. 6. Section 123.43, subsection 2, paragraphs b and c,
Code 2025, are amended to read as follows:
b. That the applicant is a person of good moral character
as provided in section 123.3, subsection 40. This paragraph
does not apply if the applicant is the state of Iowa or a state
agency as defined in section 669.2.
c. That the applicant is a citizen of the state of Iowa
or, if a corporation, that the applicant is authorized to do
business in the state. This paragraph does not apply if the
applicant is the state of Iowa or a state agency as defined in
section 669.2.
Sec. 7. Section 123.49, subsection 2, paragraph d,
subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Mixed drinks or cocktails mixed on premises covered by
a class “C” or special class “C” retail alcohol license, or a
LSB 1392XD (4) 91
-2- ll/ns 2/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
special class “C” retail native wine license, for consumption
off the licensed premises may be sold if the mixed drink or
cocktail is immediately filled in a sealed container and is
promptly taken from the licensed premises prior to consumption
of the mixed drink or cocktail. A mixed drink or cocktail
that is sold in a sealed container in compliance with the
requirements of this subparagraph and rules adopted by the
department shall not be deemed an open container subject to the
requirements of sections 321.284 and 321.284A if the sealed
container is unopened and the seal has not been tampered with,
and the contents of the container have not been partially
removed.
Sec. 8. Section 123.127, subsection 2, paragraphs b and c,
Code 2025, are amended to read as follows:
b. That the applicant is a person of good moral character
as provided in section 123.3, subsection 40. This paragraph
does not apply if the applicant is the state of Iowa or a state
agency as defined in section 669.2.
c. That the applicant is a citizen of the state of Iowa
or, if a corporation, that the applicant is authorized to do
business in the state. This paragraph does not apply if the
applicant is the state of Iowa or a state agency as defined in
section 669.2.
Sec. 9. Section 123.175, subsection 2, paragraphs b and c,
Code 2025, are amended to read as follows:
b. That the applicant is a person of good moral character
as provided in section 123.3, subsection 40. This paragraph
does not apply if the applicant is the state of Iowa or a state
agency as defined in section 669.2.
c. That the applicant is a citizen of the state of Iowa
or, if a corporation, that the applicant is authorized to do
business in the state. This paragraph does not apply if the
applicant is the state of Iowa or a state agency as defined in
section 669.2.
Sec. 10. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being
LSB 1392XD (4) 91
-3- ll/ns 3/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment.
DIVISION II
LICENSE FEE DETERMINATION
Sec. 11. Section 123.36, subsection 1, paragraph a,
subparagraph (4), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(4) For premises located outside the corporate limits of
any city, a fee equal to that charged to for a premises with
of the same square footage in the nearest incorporated city
located nearest the premises to be licensed, as determined by
the address assigned by the United States postal service. If
there is doubt as to which of two or more differing corporate
limits is the nearest, the license fee which is the largest
shall prevail. However, if the premises is located in an
unincorporated town, for purposes of this paragraph, the
unincorporated town shall be treated as if it is a city.
Sec. 12. Section 123.36, subsection 1, paragraph c,
subparagraph (4), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(4) Commercial establishments located outside the corporate
limits of any city, a fee equal to that charged in the
incorporated city located nearest the premises to be licensed,
and in case there is doubt as to which of two or more differing
corporate limits is the nearest, the license fee which is the
largest shall prevail as determined by the address assigned by
the United States postal service. However, if a commercial
establishment is located in an unincorporated town, for
purposes of this paragraph, the unincorporated town shall be
treated as if it is a city.
Sec. 13. Section 123.36, subsection 1, paragraph d,
subparagraph (4), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(4) Commercial establishments located outside the corporate
limits of any city, a fee equal to that charged in the
incorporated city located nearest the premises to be licensed,
and in case there is doubt as to which of two or more differing
corporate limits is the nearest, the license fee which is the
largest shall prevail as determined by the address assigned by
LSB 1392XD (4) 91
-4- ll/ns 4/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the United States postal service. However, if a commercial
establishment is located in an unincorporated town, for
purposes of this paragraph, the unincorporated town shall be
treated as if it is a city.
Sec. 14. Section 123.36, subsection 1, paragraph g,
subparagraph (4), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(4) For premises located outside the corporate limits of
any city, a fee equal to that charged to for a premises with
of the same square footage in the nearest incorporated city
located nearest the premises to be licensed, as determined by
the address assigned by the United States postal service. If
there is doubt as to which of two or more differing corporate
limits is the nearest, the license fee which is the largest
shall prevail. However, if the premises is located in an
unincorporated town, for purposes of this paragraph, the
unincorporated town shall be treated as if it is a city.
Sec. 15. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies
to licenses issued or renewed on or after November 10, 2025.
A license issued prior to that date and in effect on that date
shall continue in full force and effect with the authority
originally granted by the license until expiration or renewal.